California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Any institution, firm, participating tribe, or individual wishing the approval of the bureau to offer the firearms course shall complete an application for certification as a firearms training facility. The application shall be in a form prescribed by the chief and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the institution, firm, entity, or individual.

(2) A detailed description of the places, days, and times the course will be offered.

(3) An estimate of the minimum and maximum class size.

(4) The location and description of the range facilities.

(5) The name or names of the firearms training instructors who will teach the course who have been certified by the bureau, and their certificate numbers, if available.

(b) The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 39.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.4.

Upon approval by the bureau of a firearms training facility, the chief shall issue to the facility a “Firearms Training Facility Certificate.” The certificate is valid only when the firearms training facility has in its employ a firearms training instructor who has been certified by the bureau. The certificate shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.4.1.

(a) (1) Within 120 days after issuance of a “Firearms Training Facility Certificate,” the bureau shall inspect the facility for compliance with the applicable requirements of this article and the applicable rules and regulations of the bureau adopted pursuant to this article.

(2) The bureau may inspect the establishment for which a certificate application has been made prior to the issuance of the certificate.

(b) The bureau shall maintain a program of random and targeted inspections of facilities to ensure compliance with applicable laws relating to the conduct and operation of facilities.

(c) If the bureau determines that any facility is not complying with applicable laws relating to the conduct and operation of facilities, notice thereof shall immediately be given to the facility.

(d) In addition to the notice, the bureau may issue a citation or take other disciplinary action for violations of applicable laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 38.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.5.

(a) Any individual who desires certification by the bureau to instruct a firearms course shall complete an application for a firearms training instructor certificate. An application shall be made on a form provided by the bureau.

(b) An applicant for a firearms training instructor certificate shall meet the following minimum qualifications:

(1) Possess an associate of arts degree in the administration of justice or one year of teaching or training experience in firearms or the equivalent thereof.

(2) Possess a police or security firearms instructor training certificate issued by the National Rifle Association or a firearms instructor training certificate issued by a federal, state, or local agency.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(d) Upon approval by the bureau of an applicant for certification as a firearms training instructor, the chief shall issue to the applicant a “Firearms Training Instructor Certificate.” The certificate shall be posted at the training site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.6.

(a) All firearms course material provided to the certificate holder in the “Firearms Training Manual” issued by the bureau shall be covered in each class session. In no event shall the class instruction total less than eight hours for the initial firearms qualification.

The range instruction for the initial firearms qualification shall not exceed eight hours and shall cover the following subjects:

(1) Range safety and procedure.

(2) Demonstration and dry firing.

(3) Practice rounds.

(4) Qualification firing.

(b) If a person fails to successfully complete the range instruction, that person may, at the discretion of the firearms training facility, continue range instruction for an additional eight hours. However, the person shall, in order to receive a firearms qualification card, be required to successfully pass the range instruction within 30 days of the passage of the classroom instruction.

(c) Prior to range instruction a person shall participate in the classroom instruction and pass a bureau-developed examination of the subject matter with a minimum score of 85 percent. If a person fails to pass the written examination, they shall once more participate in the entire classroom instruction prior to retaking the examination. In no event shall a firearm instructor review the examination question by question with a person, allow a person to review the examination questions and answers, or
 in any manner assist a person with the examination.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 36.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.7.

(a) Each firearms training facility shall be required to retain for two years the following information regarding each student:

(1) The student’s name.

(2) The date of course completion.

(3) Any information regarding the passage or failure of the firearms training course.

(4) The instructor’s name.

(5) The make and caliber of the qualifying weapon.

(6) The range scores.

(7) The written examination scores.

(b) Records shall be made available for examination by the bureau on demand. 

(c) Each firearm training facility shall have a written procedure for the security of the written examination which shall be made available for inspection by the bureau on demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.8.

(a) Each firearm training facility shall, before allowing any person to participate in the course of training in the carrying and usage of firearms, verify and certify on the firearms qualification application that they have seen documentation verifying that the person to whom they are providing firearms training is a citizen of the United States or possesses permanent legal immigration status in the United States in accordance with Sections 7583.23 and 7596.3.

(b) Each firearm training facility shall, before allowing any person to participate in the requalification course in the carrying and usage of firearms, verify and certify on the firearm requalification application that the
 firearm training facility has seen documentation verifying that the person to whom they are providing firearms training is a citizen of the United States or possesses permanent legal immigration status in the United States in accordance with Sections 7583.32 and 7596.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 44.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.9.

(a) The course of training in the carrying and usage of the baton, the satisfactory completion of which shall be required of applicants who wish to obtain a baton permit, shall be in the format prescribed by the Department of Consumer Affairs as delineated in the bureau’s “Baton Training Manual.” The course of training contained in the manual shall include, but not be limited to, the following subjects:

(1) Moral and legal aspects of baton usage.

(2) Use of force.

(3) Baton familiarization and uses.

(4) First aid for baton injuries.

(5) Fundamentals of baton handling.

(A) Stances and grips.

(B) Target areas.

(C) Defensive techniques.

(D) Control techniques.

(E) Arrest and control techniques.

(6) Examination of the subject matter as taught in the classroom and as provided by the bureau.

(b) The baton training outline distributed by the Department of Justice shall be recognized as an approved outline for the baton training course until January 1, 1984, or until the bureau distributes the “Baton Training Manual.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.10.

For purposes of this article “a baton course” means the baton training course as outlined in Section 7585.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.11.

(a) Any institution, firm, participating tribe, or individual wishing approval of the bureau to offer the baton course shall complete an application for certification as a baton training facility. The application shall be in a form prescribed by the chief and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The name, business address, and telephone number of the institution, firm, or individual.

(2) A detailed description of the places, days, and times the course will be offered.

(3) An estimate of the minimum and maximum class size.

(4) Location and description of the facilities.

(5) The name or names of the baton instructors who will teach the course who have been certified by the bureau, and their certificate numbers if available.

(b) The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(c) No approval shall be given, and no certification shall be issued, to a baton training facility until a baton training instructor who has been certified by the bureau has been approved to teach the course.

(d) Upon approval by the bureau of a baton training facility, the chief shall issue to the facility a “Baton Training Facility Certificate.” The certificate is valid only when the baton training facility has
 in its employ a baton training instructor who has been certified by the bureau. The certificate shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 40.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.12.

Any individual who desires certification by the bureau to instruct the baton course shall complete an application for a baton training instructor certificate. An application shall be made on a form provided by the bureau.

An applicant for a baton training instructor certificate shall meet the following minimum qualifications:

(a) Possess an associate of arts degree in the administration of justice or the equivalent thereof.

(b) Possess a baton instructor certificate issued by a federal, state, or local agency or one year of verifiable baton teaching or training experience or the equivalent thereof to be determined by the chief.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(d) Upon approval by the bureau of an applicant for certification as a baton training instructor, the chief shall issue to the applicant a “Baton Training Instructor Certificate.” The certificate shall be posted at the baton training site.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.13.

All baton course material provided to the certificate holder in the “Baton Training Manual” issued by the bureau shall be covered in each class session. In no event shall the class instruction for the course required for baton certification total less than eight hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.15.

(a) Each baton training facility shall be required to retain for two years the following information regarding each student:

(1) The student’s name.

(2) The date of course completion.

(3) Any information regarding the passage or failure of the baton training course.

(4) The instructor’s name.

(5) Written examination scores.

(b) Records shall be made available for examination by the bureau on demand. 

(c) Each baton training facility shall have a written procedure for the security of the examinations and the baton certificates which shall be made available for inspection by the bureau on demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.16.

(a) In the event of the loss, theft, or destruction of a baton permit, a permitholder may request the bureau to issue a replacement permit. The request shall be in writing, shall state the circumstances surrounding the loss, theft, or destruction of the permit and the name of the instructor, training facility, and date of instruction relating to the issuance of the original baton permit. The request shall be accompanied by a fee prescribed in this chapter. The bureau may issue a replacement baton permit upon verification of successful baton training.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 45) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 46.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.17.

Each firearms training facility or baton training facility shall notify the bureau within five working days whenever any training instructor certified by the bureau is employed or ceases to be employed with the training facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.18.

Each firearms training facility, firearms training instructor, baton training facility, or baton training instructor shall report to the bureau the name of any person who, while taking the course, demonstrated that the carrying and usage of a firearm or the carrying and usage of a baton by that person would present an undue hazard to the safety of the public. The report shall contain the name and address of the student, the name of the student’s employer, if available, and the reasons or specific incident which caused the certificate holder to make the report. All substantiating documents, including, but not limited to, an affidavit from the instructor regarding the incident, or reasons, shall be included in the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.19.

(a) The chief may refuse to issue or may cancel a previously issued firearms training facility certificate, firearms training instructor certificate, baton training facility certificate, or baton training instructor certificate, or may assess fines pursuant to Section 7587.7, on the grounds that one or more instructors have done any of the following:

(1) Failed to maintain the records required by Section 7585.7 or 7585.15.

(2) Failed to submit the records to the bureau as required by Section 7585.14.

(3) Given inaccurate instructions regarding the laws of California and the regulations of the bureau, including, but not limited to, the necessity of an individual to possess a valid firearms qualification card issued by the bureau prior to carrying any firearm; or the necessity of an individual to possess a valid baton permit issued by the bureau prior to carrying any baton.

(4) Used improper caution while instructing students, so as to endanger the safety of students.

(5) Failed to instruct completely in accordance with the bureau’s “Firearms Training Manual” as required by Section 7585.6.

(6) Failed to instruct completely in accordance with the bureau’s “Baton Training Manual” as required by Section 7585.9.

(7) Allowed a noncertified instructor to teach any portion of the firearms course, including range qualification. This does not include range coaches employed to assist the instructor.

(8) Allowed a noncertified instructor to teach any portion of the baton course.

(9) Falsified any application for registration, firearms qualification card, firearms requalification permit, or baton certificate.

(10) Failed to inform the bureau of any range or classroom incident as required by Section 7585.18.

(11) Failed to notify the bureau of any change of employment pursuant to Section 7585.17.

(12) Made any false statement of fact required to be revealed in the application for certification as a firearms training facility or as a firearms training instructor.

(b) Fines shall not be assessed on firearms training facilities which are a part of the California community college system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7585.20.

(a) A firearms training facility certificate, a firearms training instructor certificate, a baton training facility certificate, or a baton training instructor certificate which expires on or after January 1, 1985, shall be placed on a cyclical renewal and shall expire two years following the date of issuance or assigned renewal date. In order to implement the cyclical renewal, the population of licensees mentioned in this section shall be divided into 24 equal groups, the licenses of each group to expire on the last day of each successive month. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the bureau shall have authority to extend or shorten the first term of licensure following January 1, 1985, and to prorate the required license fee in order to implement this cyclical renewal. To renew an unexpired certificate, the certificate holder shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(b) If renewal is granted, evidence of renewal of the certificate that the director may prescribe shall be issued to the certificate holder.

(c) In the event the certificate holder fails to renew his or her training facility certificate, the certificate shall be automatically canceled, but may be reinstated within three years of the date of cancellation upon application for reinstatement and upon the payment of the reinstatement fee provided by this chapter. In the event the certificate holder fails to renew his or her training instructor certificate, the certificate shall be automatically canceled, but may be reinstated within 30 days of the date of cancellation upon application for reinstatement and upon the payment of the reinstatement fee provided by this chapter. Reinstatement of a canceled certificate shall not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for any act committed in violation of this chapter during the period the certificate is canceled.

(d) A firearms training facility, a firearms training instructor, a baton training facility, or a baton training instructor whose certificate has not been renewed may obtain a new license only upon compliance with all of the provisions of this article relating to the issuance of an original certificate.

(e) A firearms training facility, firearms training instructor, baton training facility, or a baton training instructor certificate shall not be renewed until any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7587.7 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 18.6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Expiration and Renewal of License [7586. - 7586.5.]

7586.

(a) A private patrol operator license, branch office certificate, qualified manager certificate, and pocket card issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month two years following the date of issuance unless renewed.

(b) To renew an unexpired qualified manager certificate, the qualified manager shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, pay all fines assessed to the certificate, and pay the renewal fee as provided in this chapter. To renew an expired certificate, the qualified manager shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director and pay all fines assessed to the certificate, the renewal fee, and the delinquency fee as provided in this chapter.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 30) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7586.1.

(a) To renew an unexpired license or certificate, the licensee shall, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter. On renewal, such evidence of renewal of the license or certificate as the director may prescribe, and renewal pocket cards for the persons mentioned in Section 7582.13, shall be issued to the licensee.

(b) A license or certificate shall not be renewed until any and all fines assessed pursuant to Section 7587.7 and not resolved in accordance with the provisions of that section have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7586.2.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, an expired license or branch office certificate may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing of application for renewal on a form prescribed by the director, and payment of the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date. If the license or certificate is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed in this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee is paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license or certificate shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 7586 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

Renewal of a license or certificate shall not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for an act committed before the effective date of the renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 18.7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7586.3.

(a) A suspended license, branch office certificate, or qualified manager certificate is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal of the license does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended, and renewal of the branch office certificate or qualified manager certificate does not entitle the licensee, while the certificate remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity at the location for which the certificate was issued, or to engage in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or
 judgment by which the certificate was suspended.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 32) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7586.4.

(a) A revoked license, branch office certificate, or qualified manager certificate is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 34) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7586.5.

A license or branch office certificate which is not renewed within three years after its expiration may not be renewed, restored, reinstated, or reissued thereafter.

The holder of the license or certificate may obtain a new license or certificate only on compliance with all of the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 18.8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Disciplinary Proceedings [7587. - 7587.16.]

7587.

Except as otherwise required to comply with the provisions of Section 7581.3 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 7586), the proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.1.

Notwithstanding Section 477, a firearm qualification card and a baton permit shall be considered a license subject to the terms of this section.

Notwithstanding the assessment or payment of fines for any violations of this chapter, the director may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this chapter if they determine that the licensee or their manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has:

(a) Made any false statement or given any false information in connection with an application for a license or a renewal or reinstatement of a license.

(b) Violated any provisions of
 this chapter.

(c) Violated any rule of the director adopted pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter.

(d) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(e) Impersonated, or permitted or aided and abetted an employee to impersonate a law enforcement officer or employee of the United States of America, or of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(f) Committed or permitted any employee to commit any act, while the license was expired which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license, or grounds for the denial of an application for a license.

(g) Willfully failed or refused to render to a client services or a report as agreed between the parties and for which compensation has been paid or tendered in accordance with the agreement of the parties.

(h) Committed assault, battery, or kidnapping, or used force or violence on any person, without proper justification or any use of force in violation of the standards prescribed by the bureau by regulation.

(i) Knowingly violated, or advised, encouraged, or assisted the violation of any court order or injunction in the course of business as a licensee.

(j) Acted as a runner or capper for any attorney.

(k) Been convicted of a violation of Section 148 of the Penal Code.

(l) Committed any act which is a ground for denial of an application for a license under this chapter.

(m) Committed any act prohibited by Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 630) of Title 15 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(n) Purchased, possessed, or transported any tear gas weapon except as authorized by law. A violation of this subdivision may be punished by the suspension of a license for a period to be determined by the director.

(o) Been convicted of a violation of Section 95.3 of the Penal Code.

(p) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 20) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 39.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.2.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement in his or her application for a license or registration as a security guard is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.3.

The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee or his or her manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has:

(a) Used any letterhead, advertisement, or other printed matter, or in any manner whatever represented that he or she is an instrumentality of the federal government, a state, or any political subdivision thereof.

(b) Used a name different from that under which he or she is currently licensed in any advertisement, solicitation, or contract for business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.4.

The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if he or she determines that the licensee or his or her manager, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, that any of its officers, directors, partners, or its manager, has committed any act in the course of the licensee’s business constituting dishonesty or fraud.

“Dishonesty or fraud” as used in this section, includes, in addition to other acts not specifically enumerated herein:

(a) Knowingly making a false statement relating to evidence or information obtained in the course of employment, or knowingly publishing a slander or a libel in the course of business.

(b) Using illegal means in the collection or attempted collection of a debt or obligation.

(c) Manufacture of evidence.

(d) Acceptance of employment adverse to a client or former client relating to a matter with respect to which the licensee has obtained confidential information by reason of or in the course of his or her employment by the client or former client.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.5.

The record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction as that term is used in this article, Section 7582.24, or Section 480.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article, Section 7582.24, or Section 480. The director may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw his or her plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.6.

The director, in lieu of suspending or revoking a license issued under this chapter for violations of Sections 7587.1, 7587.3, and 7587.4, may impose a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) upon a licensee, if the director determines that this action better serves the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.7.

If, upon investigation, the director determines a licensee, including a corporation, or registrant is in violation of Section 7583.2, 7583.3, 7583.37, 7585.19, 7587.2, or 7587.14, the director may issue a citation to the licensee or registrant. The citation shall be in writing and shall describe with particularity the nature of the violation, including specific reference to the provision of law determined to have been violated. If the director deems it appropriate, the citation may contain an order of abatement fixing a reasonable time for abatement of the violation and may contain an assessment of an administrative fine. The amount of the fine shall in no event exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or as otherwise provided in this chapter, whichever is less.

A citation or fine assessment shall inform the licensee or registrant that if he or she contests the finding of a violation, they may request a review by a disciplinary review committee in accordance with Section 7581.3. If a review is not requested pursuant to this section, payment of any fine shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged. If a review is not allowed under this chapter, a licensee or registrant may request a hearing in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if he or she wishes to contest the findings of a violation, and if a hearing is not requested, payment of any fines shall not constitute an admission of the violation charged.

If the licensee or registrant neither requests a review, nor pays the assessed fine within 30 days of the assessment, the license or registration of the person shall not be renewed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter until the assessed fine is paid.

Administrative fines collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund, which fund is hereby created to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 607, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.8.

The director may assess fines for the following acts pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7583) only as follows:

(a) Violation of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 7583.2; five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.

(b) Violation of subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 7583.2; two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation.

(c) Violation of subdivision (f) of Section 7583.2; five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(d) Violation of subdivision (e) of Section 7583.2; two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation, notwithstanding any other provision of
 law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 21.   (AB 229)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.9.

The director may assess fines for the following acts pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7583) only as follows:

(a) Violation of subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 7583.3; one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per violation.

(b) Violation of subdivision (c) or (e) of Section 7583.3; five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation and one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation for each violation thereafter.

(c) Violation of Section 7583.4; five hundred dollars ($500) per violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 697, Sec. 22.   (AB 229)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.10.

The director may assess fines for the following acts pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7583) only as follows:

(a) Violation of subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 7583.37; one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and two hundred dollars ($200) for each violation thereafter.

(b) Violation of subdivision (a) of Section 7583.37; one hundred dollars ($100) for the first violation and five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation thereafter.

(c) Violation of subdivision (e) of Section 7583.37; one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) Violation of subdivision (b) of Section 7583.37; one thousand dollars ($1,000) and suspension of a firearm qualification card for six months for the first violation and, for a violation thereafter, one thousand dollars ($1,000) and a suspension of a firearm qualification card for not more than one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 41.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of any person licensed to do business as a corporation in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board after notice from the bureau shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee by operation of law. The bureau shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both, and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the bureau that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by providing proof satisfactory to the
 bureau that the license is properly registered and in good standing and the payment of the reinstatement fee as prescribed by this chapter.

(b) This section shall not apply to a participating tribe or a participating tribe’s business that is chartered under tribal or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 41.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.12.

The director may assess fines for the following acts only as follows:

(a) Violations of paragraph (1), (2), (11), or (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation and five hundred dollars ($500) for subsequent violations.

(b) Violations of paragraph (3), (7), (8), or (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

(c) Violations of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; five hundred dollars ($500) for each hour shortened.

(d) Violations of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

(e) Violations of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; five hundred dollars ($500) for every hour the course has been shortened.

(f) Violations of paragraph (9) of subdivision (a) of Section 7585.19; one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 800, Sec. 42.   (SB 1196)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.13.

Any person who knowingly falsifies the fingerprints or photographs submitted pursuant to any provision of this chapter is guilty of a felony. Any person who violates any of the other provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7587.14.
